Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1508
Designated wellhead protection area; boundary area changes.

A designated wellhead protection area may be amended as to boundaries and controls as provided for in the initial designation of a wellhead protection area in the Wellhead Protection Area Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 9.